Rhode Island statutes. Title 29 Libraries
Chapter 7 State Publications Clearinghouse

29-7-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a state publications clearinghouse for libraries that will systematically collect and distribute state publications to libraries throughout the state in order to facilitate public access to publications issued by state agencies and for exchange of publications with agencies outside of the state under the direction of the state librarian as provided in §

29-1-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 27.

29-7-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Depository library” means a library designated to collect, maintain, and make available state publications to the general public. The clearinghouse director shall consider the geography of the state when designating depository libraries;

“Printed” means any form of printing and duplicating, regardless of format, with the exception of correspondence, and interoffice and intraoffice memoranda;

“State agency” means any state office, whether legislative, executive, or judicial, including, but not limited to, any constitutional officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission, and/or any other agency that expends state appropriated funds; and

“State publication” means any publication, regardless of physical form or characteristics produced, made available electronically, printed, purchased, or authorized for distribution by a state agency, except those determined by the issuing agency to be required for official use only for administrative or operational purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 27.

29-7-3.
Creation.

There is hereby created, as a section of the state library, and under the direction of the state librarian, a state publications clearinghouse for libraries, hereinafter referred to as “the clearinghouse”. The clearinghouse shall promote the establishment of an orderly depository library system and shall maintain a complete and permanent collection of state publications. To this end, the secretary of state, with the assistance of the state librarian and the director of the state publications clearinghouse for libraries and the clearinghouse advisory committee, shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 1.

29-7-4.
Director.

The state librarian shall designate from the state library staff a director of the state publications clearinghouse. The director shall hold a graduate degree in library science from an accredited library school.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 1.

29-7-5.
Deposits of state publications.

Each state agency shall designate one person as its documents officer and shall notify the clearinghouse of his or her identity. The documents officer shall, prior to public release of a state publication, deposit with the clearinghouse a minimum of twenty-five (25) copies of publications that are produced in printed or other tangible forms and for electronic publications, one electronic copy and as many tangible copies as are specified by the clearinghouse director to meet the needs of the depository library system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-7-4

; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 167, § 1.

29-7-6.
Depository agreements.

The clearinghouse may enter into depository agreements with any municipal library, public library, private college or university library, or research library in the state of Rhode Island, and shall provide for distribution of state publications to the Center for Research Libraries and the Library of Congress. The requirements for eligibility to become and continue as a depository library shall be established by the clearinghouse. The standards shall include, and take into consideration, the type of library, ability to preserve state publications and to make them available for public use, and also such geographical locations as will make the publications conveniently accessible to residents in all areas of the state, except as otherwise provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-7-5

; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2.

29-7-7.
List of state publications.

The clearinghouse shall publish and distribute to depository libraries, all other libraries, state agencies, and legislators, a quarterly checklist of state publications.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 254, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

29-7-6

; P.L. 1985, ch. 196, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 1.

29-7-8.
Clearinghouse advisory committee.

There shall be a state publications clearinghouse advisory committee. The committee shall consist of nine (9) members, five (5) of whom to be selected from the clearinghouse member libraries and appointed by the state librarian to two-year (2) terms. The state librarian and the director of the clearinghouse shall be ex-officio members of the committee. The chairperson of the CRIARL government documents committee or designee, who shall be a member of the CRIARL committee, and a state agency representative designated by the chief library officer shall also be ex-officio members. The purpose of the committee shall be to advise the state librarian and the clearinghouse director on the operation of the state publications clearinghouse for libraries. The committee shall meet quarterly and shall elect a chairperson to preside at meetings, and a secretary to record the meeting minutes and distribute them to the clearinghouse depository libraries.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 101, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 1.